Nebraska, session 109, LB230A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $251,010 from the Department
of Revenue Enforcement Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $121,600 from the Department
of Revenue Enforcement Fund for FY2026-27 to the Department of Revenue, for
Program 102, to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 230, One
Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $88,600 for FY2025-26 or
$91,400 for FY2026-27.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-